Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB49.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 322 IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
It is the intent of the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky to:
(1) Ensure the availability of professional engineers and professional land surveyors in the Commonwealth;
and
(2) Address professional engineer and professional land surveyor workforce development and needs
throughout the Commonwealth by providing eligible Kentucky residents with scholarships to:
(a) Attend a qualifying program at a postsecondary institution in the Commonwealth; and
(b) Become licensed as a professional engineer or professional land surveyor in the Commonwealth.
SECTION 2. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 322 IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) There is hereby established in the State Treasury a trust and agency account to be known as the Kentucky
professional engineer and professional land surveyor incentive scholarship fund. The fund shall consist of
moneys received as described in Section 4 of this Act.
(2) The fund shall be administered by the board.
(3) Amounts deposited in the fund shall be used for the scholarships established in Section 3 of this Act.
(4) Notwithstanding KRS 45.229, fund amounts not expended at the close of the fiscal year shall not lapse but
shall be carried forward into the next fiscal year.
SECTION 3. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 322 IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) The board shall make engineering and land surveying scholarships available to Kentucky residents through
the Kentucky professional engineer and professional land surveyor incentive scholarship fund established
in Section 2 of this Act in accordance with Sections 1 to 4 of this Act and administrative regulations
promulgated pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A.
(2) The board shall administer the Kentucky professional engineer and professional land surveyor incentive
scholarship fund and may recover reasonable costs for administering the fund. The board shall receive and
evaluate all applications for the scholarship made by bona fide Kentucky residents who desire to become
professional engineers or professional land surveyors. The board shall evaluate each application to
determine if the applicant complies with criteria for the scholarships as set forth in this section and in the
administrative regulations of the board.
(3) From among the qualified applications, the board shall designate the persons to receive assistance and the
amount of the scholarship award. The board's scholarship decisions shall be final. Disbursement of funds
shall occur pursuant to a written contract between the board and the applicant.
(4) The board shall annually determine the amount and number of individual professional engineering and
professional land surveying scholarship awards to be granted by using its best judgment and shall seek to
maintain the scholarship funds for future use.
(5) Each recipient of a scholarship granted under Sections 1 to 4 of this Act shall agree in the written contract
to:
(a) Obtain a professional engineer or professional land surveyor license in Kentucky within six (6) years
of graduation; and
(b) Engage in the licensed practice of professional engineering or professional land surveying in
Kentucky for at least one (1) year for each academic year the recipient received the scholarship
funds.
SECTION 4. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 322 IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

2 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(1) Funding for the Kentucky professional engineer and professional land surveyor incentive scholarship fund:
(a) Shall be supplied partly by funds received from penalties and fines assessed by the board pursuant to
KRS 322.180;
(b) Shall be provided by an assessment of five dollars ($5) from each professional engineer and
professional land surveyor licensure renewal application fee payable to the board, the proceeds of
which shall be annually allocated to the Kentucky professional engineer and professional land
surveyor incentive scholarship fund; and
(c) May be provided by the board from its budgeted funds.
(2) (a) The board may cancel any contract entered into under Section 3 of this Act if an applicant or
recipient fails to meet the requirements of Section 3 of this Act or the administrative regulations of
the board.
(b) Failure to complete the terms of the contract shall subject the applicant to legal action for the
recovery of all assistance provided, along with the attorney's fees and interest at an annual
compound rate of eight percent (8%) from the date of disbursement from the Kentucky professional
engineer and professional land surveyor incentive scholarship fund.
(3) By August 1 of each year, the board shall submit a report to the Legislative Research Commission for
referral to the Interim Joint Committee on Licensing, Occupations, and Administrative Regulations relating
to the Kentucky professional engineer and professional land surveyor incentive scholarship fund. The
report shall contain at a minimum the following information for the previous fiscal year:
(a) The number of scholarships provided;
(b) The program of study in which the recipients are enrolled;
(c) The total number of applications;
(d) The total number of scholarships recipients; and
(e) The amount awarded to recipients.
Signed by Governor April 3, 2026.